Maryland, session 2026, SB0045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–101.
(a) In this title and Title 25 of this article the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(s) “Residential district” means an area that:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0045*

SENATE BILL 45
(1) Is not a business district; and
(2) Adjoins and includes a highway where the property along the highway,
for a distance of at least 300 feet, is improved mainly with residences or residences and
buildings used for business.
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(9) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(b) (1) (i) 1. A speed monitoring system may not be used by a local
jurisdiction under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local
jurisdiction by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
2. The State Highway Administration may use speed
monitoring systems on Interstate 83 in Baltimore County and Interstate 695 in Baltimore
County in accordance with this section.
3. The Maryland Transportation Authority may use speed
monitoring systems on Maryland Route 200 (Intercounty Connector) in accordance with
this section.
(vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been
placed:
1. [In Anne Arundel County, Montgomery County, or Prince
George’s County, on] ON a highway in a residential district, as defined in § 21–101 of this
title, with a maximum posted speed limit of 35 miles per hour, which speed limit was
established using generally accepted traffic engineering practices;
2. In a school zone with a posted speed limit of at least 20
miles per hour;
3. In Prince George’s County:
A. Subject to subparagraph (vii)1 of this paragraph, on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway); or
B. On that part of a highway located within the grounds of
an institution of higher education as defined in § 10–101(h) of the Education Article, or
within one–half mile of the grounds of a building or property used by the institution of
higher education where generally accepted traffic and engineering practices indicate that

SENATE BILL 45 3
motor vehicle, pedestrian, or bicycle traffic is substantially generated or influenced by the
institution of higher education;
4. Subject to subparagraph (vii)2 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City;
5. In Anne Arundel County, on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line;
6. Subject to subparagraph (vii)3 of this paragraph, at the
intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County;
7. Subject to subparagraph (vii)4 of this paragraph, by the
State Highway Administration on Interstate 83 in Baltimore County or on Interstate 695
in Baltimore County;
8. By the Maryland Transportation Authority on Maryland
Route 200 (Intercounty Connector) in Montgomery County; or
9. Subject to subparagraph (xii) of this paragraph, in
Montgomery County on a highway identified in the municipality’s, county’s, or State’s most
recent Strategic Highway Safety Plan or Vision Zero Plan as a highway that is at high risk
for motor vehicle crashes that result in serious bodily injury or death.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.